Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.230

Organization on council-manager plan—Eligibility.

Any city or town having a population of less than thirty thousand may be organized as a council-manager city or town under this chapter.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.18.230. Prior: 1959 c 76 s 2; 1943 c 271 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-10.]